Hawaii statutes.
§147-97 Disposition of fees. All fees
collected under this part shall be paid into a special fund established by the
department of agriculture and shall be expended for the purposes of this part.
[L 1957, c 172, §1(f); Supp, §22-96; HRS §147-97; am L 2003, c 49, §7]

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next